Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 2 Duties of Utilities and Carriers
39-2-8.
Penalty for violations.

Any public utility which shall violate any provision of chapters 1 — 5 of this title, or shall do any act herein prohibited, or shall fail or refuse to perform any duty enjoined upon it for which a penalty has not been provided, shall be subject to a penalty of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and in the case of a continuing violation of any of the provisions of the chapters, every day’s continuance thereof shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 56; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 52; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-8

; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 2.

39-2-9.
Uniform services and rates of carriers.

Every common carrier shall receive and transport all goods, wares, and merchandise offered to him or her by any person, as promptly and upon as favorable terms and conditions as the common carrier is receiving and transporting goods, wares, and merchandise at the place in which the same are offered to be delivered to him or her, in the ordinary course of business, for any other person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 161, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 190, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 218, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 123, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-9

.

39-2-10.
Injunction or mandamus.

The superior court may enforce compliance with the provisions of §

39-2-9

by writ of injunction or mandamus.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 161, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 190, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 218, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 123, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-2-10

.

39-2-11.
Penalty for refusal of carrier to receive and transport.

Every common carrier who shall refuse or neglect to receive and transport goods, wares, and merchandise in the manner as provided in this chapter shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 161, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 190, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 218, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 123, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-11

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 105.

39-2-12.
Civil liability of carrier for refusal.

Every common carrier who shall so neglect or refuse shall also be civilly liable to any person aggrieved for any injury sustained by him or her by reason of the carrier’s neglect or refusal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 161, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 190, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 218, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 123, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-12

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 105.

39-2-13.
Admission of guide dogs.

Any blind or deaf person, who uses the services of a seeing-eye guide dog, or personal-assistance animal or a hearing-ear signal dog, clearly identified as such by a yellow harness and trained by a recognized training agency or school, may enter any public facility of any public utility or common carrier in this state, and when riding on any bus or other public utility or common carrier engaged in the transportation of passengers, or when riding in any elevator in this state where a landlord has the elevator operated for the use of the landlord’s tenants and their visitors or while in any building in this state open to the public, may keep the animal in his or her immediate custody; and the person shall not be required to pay any charge or fare, for, or on account of, the transportation thereon of him or herself and any dog so accompanying him or her, in addition to the charge or fare lawfully chargeable for his or her own transportation; provided, however, the provisions of this section shall not apply to railroad sleeping, parlor, club, buffet, or lounge cars.

History of Section.

P.L. 1938, ch. 2595, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 402, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-16

; G.L. 1956, §

39-2-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 3; P.L. 1979, ch. 159, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 3; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 3.

39-2-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 402, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1686, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 39-2-17; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 3; P.L. 1979, ch. 159, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 85, § 3, effective July 2, 1997.

39-2-15.
Interference with construction — Notice.

No utility shall interfere with, or delay the progress of work under any contract with the state department, agency, division, or board, for the construction, reconstruction, or improvements of any highway, street, road, railroad grade crossing, bridge, tunnel, underpass, overpass, or other state contract work, by failing to remove or relocate its poles, wires, cables, conduits, pipes, or any other facilities or structures within the time schedule therefor by an agreement or under the terms of an agreement between the department, agency, division, or board and the utility, or, if no time is fixed by an agreement or under the terms of such an agreement, within the time fixed by the department, agency, division, or board, by notice served upon the utility by the state department, agency, division, or board.

If the notice is utilized, it shall describe the public improvement and the geographical location thereof, the date of commencement, and the date of completion, if any, provided for by the contract; the contractor’s name and address; the manner in which and the extent to which the facilities and structures of the utility obstruct or prevent the contractor from progressing or performing the work comprehended by the contract; and shall fix the date or time within which the utility is required to remove or relocate its facilities or structures, specifying the same, in order to provide the contractor with the site when required by the contractor for progressing or performing the work pursuant to the state contract. The notice shall be in writing and shall be served upon the utility either personally or by certified mail at its principal office or place of business in the county where the work under the contract is to be performed, or, if there is no principal office or place of business in the county, at the nearest principal office or place of business of the utility, outside of the county.

In the event the utility to whom the notice described in subsection (b) was directed is, for any reason, unable, within the prescribed period, to remove or relocate the facilities or structures specified in the notice, the utility shall immediately advise the department, agency, division, or board and the contractor, in writing, of the inability, and in the same communication so advise the department, agency, division, or board, and the contractor of the approximate date that the removal or relocation of facilities or structures could be effected; and shall further state the basis for the inability of the utility to remove or relocate the facilities or structures within the time specified by the notice served thereon by the department, agency, division, or board. The department, agency, division, or board, after examining and considering the utility’s basis for establishing a different schedule for the removal or relocation, shall, if its basis is reasonable, establish and notify the utility of a revised schedule for completing the removal or relocation.

In cases where the utility has been reimbursed for removal, relocation, replacement, or reconstruction, a utility failing to complete the removal or relocation of the structures or facilities within a period of thirty (30) days beyond the time fixed therefor by the latest time schedule established in accordance with this section, shall be liable and responsible to any contractor for any damages, direct or consequential, sustained by any contractor as the result thereof, in an action to be brought by the contractor against the utility in a court of competent jurisdiction within three (3) years from the time fixed for the removal or relocation of the structures or facilities. If an action is commenced against a utility, as heretofore provided, the utility may interpose in its answer in the action any defense available under the provisions of the civil practice law and rules. The unreasonableness of the time schedule imposed by the state department, agency, division, or board shall be an absolute defense by the utility to any action by the contractor. If, in any action, the utility is found to owe nothing to the contractor, or if an offer of settlement is made by the utility that is not accepted by the contractor, and the resulting verdict against the utility is less than the offer of settlement, then in either event, the total cost of the utility of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees, shall be paid to the utility by the contractor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 105.

39-2-15.1.
Temporary removal of wires and supporting fixtures by nonprofit housing development corporation.

Whenever, in order to move a building to be used as affordable housing for low- and moderate-income persons for a period of not less than ten (10) years, a nonprofit housing development corporation desires that the pipes, mains, poles, wires, conduits, or fixtures of a public utility be cut, disconnected, or removed, the public utility shall cut, disconnect, or remove the same at its own expense.

A nonprofit housing development corporation that desires the cutting, disconnection, or removal of mains, poles, conduits, wires, or fixtures of a public utility shall give written notification thereof to the commission and the utility company. The written notification must contain the location of the site where the structure is presently located; the location of the final destination of the structure; the path of the proposed move, described in reference to the crossings of streets or highways; and the date of the required cutting, disconnection, or removal.

Upon receipt of the written notification described in subsection (b), the commission shall promptly determine whether the applicant is a nonprofit housing development corporation within the meaning of this chapter, and shall also determine whether the structure to be moved will be maintained as affordable housing for a period of not less than ten (10) years. A resolution, issued by the board of directors of the nonprofit housing development corporation and recorded at the land records office of the locality to where the structure is to be moved, stating that the structure will be used as affordable housing for a period of not less than ten (10) years, shall be satisfactory evidence that the requirements of this section have been satisfied. If the commission determines that the applicant satisfies the requirements of this section, it shall give notice thereof to the public utilities and require the applicant to coordinate its building move with the path(s), date(s), and time(s) as determined by the public utilities; however, the date(s), and time(s) shall be no later than thirty (30) days from the date the public utilities have received notice of the commission’s determination.

If, at any time during the ten-year (10) period following the cutting, disconnection, or removal of the pipes, mains, poles, wires, conduits, or fixtures of a public utility, the nonprofit housing development corporation shall utilize the structure for any purpose other than affordable housing, the nonprofit housing development corporation shall reimburse the public utility for the cost of the cutting, disconnection, or removal of the same.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 580, § 3.

39-2-16. , 39-2-17.
[Renumbered.]

39-2-18.
Shutoff devices for gas appliances.

No person, firm, corporation, or other business entity shall install in any home or business establishment any appliance that operates by the use of consumption of a combustible gas unless a shutoff device approved by the division of public utilities and carriers controlling the flow of gas into the appliances is also installed in the immediate area of the appliance; and, provided, further, that any person, firm, corporation, or other business entity that removes a valve or leaves a gas line without the shutoff device shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 307, § 1.

39-2-19.
Display of identification cards required.

Every person employed by a public utility company or nonregulated power producer doing business in this state whose job requires the person to enter homes or business establishments for the purpose of installing, repairing, servicing, meter reading, or other related activities, shall be required to display on the person an identification card bearing the person’s photograph during the performance of the person’s duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-2-20.
Communications common carriers — Duty to disclose certain information.

A communications common carrier, as defined in §

12-5.1-1

, shall disclose to the attorney general, or an assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general, or any chief of police, the director of the statewide fugitive task force, or the superintendent of state police, the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of persons to whom nonpublished service is furnished upon written certification by the attorney general, or assistant attorney general, or any chief of police, the director of the statewide fugitive task force, or the superintendent of state police that the information is necessary for an investigation of or prosecution of criminal violations of the laws of Rhode Island. No cause of action shall lie in any court against any communications common carrier, its officers, employees, or agents for furnishing or disclosing the information in accordance with the certification. The attorney general, or any chief of police, or the superintendent of state police, or the director of the statewide fugitive task force shall not disclose any information obtained as a result of the written certification except as it is essential to the proper discharge of their duties.

Upon request of a law enforcement agency, a wireless telecommunications carrier shall provide device location information concerning the telecommunications device of the user to the requesting law enforcement agency in order to respond to a call for emergency services or in an emergency situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical injury to any person and requires disclosure without delay of information relating to the emergency.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, nothing in this section prohibits a wireless telecommunications carrier from establishing protocols by which the carrier could voluntarily disclose device location information.

No cause of action shall lie in any court against any wireless telecommunications carrier, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons for providing device location information while acting in good faith and in accordance with the provisions of this section.

All wireless telecommunications carriers registered to do business in the state of Rhode Island or submitting to the jurisdiction thereof and all resellers of wireless telecommunications services shall submit their emergency contact information to the Rhode Island division of public safety’s E-911 unit in order to facilitate requests from a law enforcement agency for call location information in accordance with this section. This contact information must be submitted annually by June 15 or immediately upon any change in contact information.

The Rhode Island division of public safety’s E-911 unit shall maintain a database containing emergency contact information for all wireless telecommunications carriers registered to do business in the state of Rhode Island and shall make the information immediately available upon request to all public safety answer points in the state.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Kelsey Smith Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 3.

39-2-20.1.
Internet service providers — Duty to disclose certain information.

As used in this chapter:

“Electronic communication service” means any service that provides to its users the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications.

“Foreign entities” means any entity that makes a contract or engages in a term of service agreement with a resident of the state of Rhode Island and a foreign entity.

“Internet service provider” means an entity offering the transmission, routing, or providing of connections of digital online communications, between or among points specified by a user, of material of the user’s choosing, without modification to the content of the material as sent or received and includes a provider of online services or network access, including entities that provide an electronic communication service or remote computing service, but does not mean the offering on a common carrier basis of telecommunication facilities or of telecommunications.

“Proper service” means the delivery of a search warrant or an administrative subpoena by hand, by United States mail, by commercial delivery service, by facsimile, or by any other manner to any officer of a corporation or its general manager in the state of Rhode Island to any natural person designated by the entity as its agent for service of process, or if the corporation has designated a corporate agent.

“Remote computing service” means the provision to the public of computer storage or processing services by means of an electronic communication system.

“Service of process on a foreign entity” means that the service of a search warrant or subpoena that is properly served on the foreign entity shall have the same legal force and effect as if served personally within the state of Rhode Island.

An internet service provider, as defined herein, shall disclose subscriber account information consisting of the name, address, IP address, and telephone numbers associated with the account to the attorney general or to the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police upon proper service, and with certification under oath by the attorney general or by the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police, that the information is necessary for an officially documented criminal investigation or prosecution of criminal complaint based on probable cause related to: the exploitation for commercial or immoral purposes, pursuant to §

11-9-1

; child nudity prohibited in publications pursuant to §

11-9-1

.1; child pornography prohibited pursuant to §

11-9-1.3

; employment of children for unlawful purposes pursuant to §

11-9-2

; seizure and custody of exploited child — proceedings as against neglected child pursuant to §

11-9-3

; contributing to delinquency pursuant to §

11-9-4

; cruelty to or neglect of child pursuant to §

11-9-5

; indecent solicitation of a child pursuant to §

11-37-8.8

; access to computer for fraudulent purposes pursuant to §

11-52-2

; intentional access, alteration, damage, or destruction pursuant to §

11-52-3

; cyberstalking prohibited pursuant to §

11-52-4.2

; violation of restraining order pursuant to §

11-52-4.3

; use of false information pursuant to §

11-52-7

, video voyeurism pursuant to §

11-64-2

, online impersonation pursuant to §

11-52-7.1

, and/or electronically disseminating indecent material to minors prohibited pursuant to §

11-9-1.5

.

A duly authorized law enforcement person, as designated above, after issuing a certification pursuant to this section, if an arrest, grand jury proceeding, or any criminal prosecution does not result within sixty (60) days, shall apply to a judge for a search warrant as soon as practicable, but not later than seventy-five (75) days after issuance of the certification. In the event that the application is not approved, no information obtained or evidence derived from the subpoena shall be received in evidence or otherwise disclosed in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any court, grand jury, department, office, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other governmental authority or committee, and no information concerning any person acquired from the subpoena shall subsequently be used or disclosed in any other manner by state or local officers or employees without the consent of such person.

An administrative subpoena issued to an internet service provider shall authorize the release of non-content-based subscriber information identifying the name, address, and telephone number of the account along with the internet protocol number.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, or any other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, telephone records may not be released by an internet service provider pursuant to an administrative subpoena. The Rhode Island superior court shall have the authority to enforce the administrative subpoenas upon application by the issuing law enforcement authority.

The attorney general and/or the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police who issues an administrative subpoena to internet service providers related to: the exploitation for commercial or immoral purposes, pursuant to §

11-9-1

; child nudity prohibited in publications pursuant to §

11-9-1

.1; child pornography prohibited pursuant to §

11-9-1.3

; employment of children for unlawful purposes pursuant to §

11-9-2

; seizure and custody of exploited child — proceedings as against neglected child pursuant to §

11-9-3

; contributing to delinquency pursuant to §

11-9-4

; cruelty to or neglect of child pursuant to §

11-9-5

; indecent solicitation of a child pursuant to §

11-37-8.8

; access to computer for fraudulent purposes pursuant to §

11-52-2

; intentional access, alteration, damage, or destruction pursuant to §

11-52-3

; cyberstalking prohibited pursuant to §

11-52-4.2

; violation of restraining order pursuant to §

11-52-4.3

; use of false information pursuant to §

11-52-7

; video voyeurism pursuant to §

11-64-2

; online impersonation pursuant to §

11-52-7.1

; and/or electronically disseminating indecent material to minors prohibited pursuant to §

11-9-1.5

, shall provide an annual report to the general assembly each year detailing the following:

The number of administrative subpoenas issued in the previous year;

The number of separate criminal investigations for which the administrative subpoenas were issued and whether the administrative subpoenas resulted in an arrest, indictment, or criminal information;

The number of investigations that remain part of a pending investigation;

The number that resulted in the closing of a criminal investigation as unfounded; and

The number of investigations that did not result in an arrest, grand jury proceeding, or any criminal prosecution due to an inability to identify the subscriber.

The attorney general’s office and the Rhode Island state police shall compile and forward the reports to the general assembly on an annual basis by March 31 of each year for the previous year. The reports shall be a public record.

No cause of action shall lie in any court against any internet service provider, its officers, employees, or agents for furnishing or disclosing information, in strict compliance with this section.

No law enforcement officer, or any party to these investigations under this section, shall disclose any information obtained as a result of this section, except as it is essential to the proper discharge of their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 106, § 1.

39-2-21.
Residential condominiums and associations — Charges for services, residential rates.

Public utilities distributing electricity or providing telephone service, heat, or water, produced, transmitted, delivered, or furnished shall charge residential condominium occupants or residential condominium associations for such distribution service, heat, water, or telephone service at a residential rate and not a business, commercial or any other rate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-2-22.
Seven-digit dialing option.

In addition to other dialing, where technically and economically feasible, a telecommunications public utility shall make available to users a seven-digit (7) dialing capability for completion of intrastate Rhode Island calls outside the local calling area, unless specifically directed otherwise by the customer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 258, § 1.

39-2-23.
Safe termination of service — Qualified employees.

No gas company, as described in §

39-1-2(a)(20)

, shall allow employees to terminate, restore, or activate gas services unless those employees have gained relevant experience by working for a gas company at least two (2) years and have been properly trained in the safe termination or activation or restoration of gas services. The same criteria shall also apply to the periodic testing of meters. A certification process of gas service employees shall be established and enforced by the public utilities commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 18, § 1.

39-2-24.
Confidentiality of telephone records.

As used in this section:

“Customer” means the person who subscribes to telephone service from a telephone company or the person in whose name the telephone service is listed.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited-liability company, trust, estate, cooperative association, or other entity.

“Procure” in regard to a telephone record, means to obtain by any means, whether electronically, in writing or in oral form, with or without consideration.

“Telephone” means any device used by a person for voice communications, in connection with the services of a telephone company, whether the voice communications are transmitted in analog, data, or any other form.

“Telephone company” means any person that provides commercial telephone service to a customer, irrespective of the communications technology used to provide the service, including, but not limited to, traditional wireline or cable telephone service, cellular, broadband PCS or other wireless telephone service, microwave, satellite or other terrestrial telephone service, and voice over internet telephone service.

“Telephone record” means information retained by a telephone company that relates to a telephone number dialed by a customer or another person using the customer’s telephone with the customer’s permission, or the incoming number of a call directed to a customer or another person using the customer’s telephone with the customer’s permission, or other data related to the call typically contained on a customer’s telephone bill, including, but not limited to, the time the call started and ended; the duration of the call; the time the call was made; and any charges applied. A telephone record does not include information collected and retained by or on behalf of a customer utilizing caller identification or similar technology.

No person shall: (1) Knowingly procure, attempt to procure, solicit, or conspire with another to procure a telephone record of any resident of this state without the authorization of the customer to whom the record pertains; (2) Knowingly sell or attempt to sell a telephone record of any resident of this state without the authorization of the customer to whom the record pertains; or (3) Receive a telephone record of any resident of this state with the knowledge the record has been obtained without the authorization of the customer to whom the record pertains or by fraudulent, deceptive, or false means.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person acting pursuant to a valid court order or warrant, or a certification in accordance with §

39-2-20

for the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of persons with nonpublished service, or pursuant to chapter 21.1 of this title.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a telephone company from obtaining, using, disclosing, or permitting access to any telephone record, either directly or indirectly, through its agents, employees, or contractors: (1) As otherwise authorized by law; (2) With the lawful consent of the customer; (3) As may be necessarily incident to the rendition of the service, including, but not limited to, initiating, rendering, billing, and collecting customer charges, or to the protection of the rights or property of the telephone company, or to protect the customer of those services and other carriers from fraudulent, abusive, or unlawful use of, or subscription to, such services; (4) To a governmental entity, if the telephone company reasonably believes that an emergency involving immediate danger of death or serious physical injury to any person justifies disclosure of the information; or (5) To the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children, in connection with a report submitted thereto under section 227 of the Victims of Child Abuse Act of 1990 [repealed].

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to expand upon the obligations and duties of any telephone company to protect telephone records beyond those otherwise established by federal or state law, including, but not limited to, provisions governing customer proprietary network information in section 222 of the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, 47 U.S.C. § 222.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a telephone company and its agents or representatives who act reasonably and in good faith pursuant to this section.

Each telephone company that maintains telephone records of a resident of this state shall establish reasonable procedures to protect against unauthorized or fraudulent disclosure of records that could result in substantial harm or inconvenience to any customer. For purposes of this subsection, a telephone company’s procedures shall be deemed reasonable if the telephone company complies with the provisions governing customer proprietary network information in section 222 of the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, 47 U.S.C. § 222.

Any violation of subsection (b) of this section: (1) Involving a single telephone record of up to not more than ten (10) telephone records of a resident of this state shall be a misdemeanor; and (2) Involving more than ten (10) telephone records of a resident of this state shall be a felony.

Any violation of subsection (b) of this section shall be deemed an unfair or deceptive trade act or practice under chapter 13.1 of title 6.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 245, § 1.

39-2-25.
Contact voltage, detection, repair, and reporting.

As used in this section, “contact voltage” means and/or refers to a voltage resulting from abnormal power system conditions that may be present between two (2) conductive surfaces that can be simultaneously contacted by members of the general public and/or their animals. Contact voltage is caused by power system fault current as it flows through the impedance of available fault current pathways. Faults contributing to contact voltage may be due to electric system deterioration or damage or improper installation. Contact voltage is of greatest concern in areas where underground electric-distribution systems exist, as faults on those systems may remain active for long periods of time before detection and repair, and therefore contact voltage is a potential shock hazard.

Notwithstanding any general or public law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the Rhode Island public utilities commission and the Rhode Island division of utilities and carriers shall initiate a proceeding within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this section, to establish, after notice and provision of the opportunity for comment and public hearing, a contact voltage detection and repair program. The program shall require electric distribution companies to implement appropriate procedures to detect contact voltage on publicly accessible surfaces that could become energized by contact voltage due to faults in the underground distribution system. The program shall also recognize the potential for publicly accessible objects such as sidewalks, roadways, fences, storm drains, or other metallic gratings to become energized by faults to the underground distribution system. The program shall require every electric distribution company to adhere to appropriate procedures established by the commission to:

Designate contact voltage risk areas. The boundaries of such areas shall be approved by the commission and shall be based on the presence of underground electric distribution and situated in pedestrian-dense areas such as urban neighborhoods, commercial areas, central business districts, tourist heavy locations, and other places where pedestrians could be exposed to contact voltage;

By June 30, 2013, conduct an initial survey of no less than forty percent (40%) of designated contact voltage risk areas, for contact voltage hazards on all conductive surfaces in public rights-of-way using equipment and technology as determined by the commission;

Beginning July 1, 2013, annually survey no less than twenty percent (20%) of designated contact voltage risk areas, for contact voltage hazards on all conductive surfaces in public rights-of-way using equipment and technology as determined by the commission;

Repair power system faults of the electric distribution company’s underground distribution system, that result in contact voltage appearing on publicly accessible surfaces of a level to be determined by the division of public utilities and carriers;

If during a survey for contact voltage hazards on conductive surfaces in public rights-of-way, an energized surface is identified and the proximate cause is found not to be a utility company asset, then the utility company has no legal duty; however, the company may: clearly designate the area as a contact voltage hazard, and/or notify the account owner or owner of the asset causing the contact voltage hazard, and inform the owner of his or her obligation to perform all necessary repairs consistent with the terms contained in this section;

Annually report on contact voltage findings, including, but not limited to, the number and type of energized objects on both company-owned and customer-owned assets; voltage level; corrective action taken; shocks that occur to members of the public or to pets owned by members of the public; and any other information that the commission deems appropriate.

The commission shall require, as part of the program established pursuant to subsection (b), that electric distribution companies maintain records of the testing and subsequent maintenance or repairs performed by the electric distribution companies, and submit copies of the records to the commission, which shall make the records available for public inspection. The costs of this program shall be fully recovered by the utility company annually through a fully reconciling funding mechanism to be submitted annually to the commission for review and approval.

The commission shall review and determine which equipment and technology shall be used for the surveying of contact voltage consistent with subsections (b)(2) and (b)(3). Such a review may include, but not be limited to, the use of mobile testing technology.

Any electric distribution company that fails to comply with the requirements of the program established pursuant to subsection (b) shall be subject to a penalty to be determined by the commission and in compliance with this title.

As used in this section, “electric distribution company” means a company as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, but not including the Block Island Power Company or the Pascoag Utility District.

The commission shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this section, conclude the proceeding initiated pursuant to subsection (b). Within these one hundred twenty (120) days, the commission shall also issue an order establishing the contact voltage detection and repair program. Within one year after the issuance of the order establishing the program, and during each subsequent one-year period following the date of issuance of that order, the commission shall provide the legislature with a report on the effectiveness of the program, and any recommendations for any changes thereto, including whether to require the Block Island Power Company or the Pascoag Utility District to develop and participate in a contact voltage detection and repair program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 173, § 1.